Illinois, session 104th, HB3856.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 88/20)7    Sec. 20. Bill information. If a hospital bills a patient 8for health care services, the hospital shall provide with its 9bill the following information: 10        (1) the date or dates that health care services were 11    provided to the patient;12        (2) a brief description of the hospital services;13        (3) the amount owed for hospital services;14        (4) hospital contact information for addressing 15    billing inquiries;16        (5) a statement regarding how an uninsured patient may 17    apply for consideration under the hospital's financial 18    assistance policy on or with each hospital bill sent to an 19    uninsured patient; and20        (6) notice that the patient will be given an itemized 21    statement of charges for inpatient and outpatient services 22    rendered by the hospital unless the patient chooses to opt 23    out of receiving such a statement may obtain an itemized   HB3856- 2 -LRB104 12286 BAB 22400 b1    bill upon request. 2    If a hospital bills a patient, then the hospital must 3provide an itemized statement of charges for the inpatient and 4outpatient services rendered by the hospital unless the 5patient opts out of receiving such a statement upon receiving 6a request from the patient. The itemized statement of charges 7may be provided in an electronic format at the discretion of 8the hospital unless the patient requests a physical copy of 9the statement of charges, which shall be provided upon 10request.11    Information regarding the patient's choice to opt out 12shall be prominent, clearly labeled, and provided to the 13patient before signing any documents relating to itemized 14billing. The patient shall not be under the influence of any 15anesthetic or drug that inhibits mental performance when given 16the documents.17    The hospital's failure to comply with the requirements of 18this Section constitutes an unlawful practice under the 19Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 20(Source: P.A. 94-885, eff. 1-1-07.) 21    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 22Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 23    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)24    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who   HB3856- 3 -LRB104 12286 BAB 22400 b1knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 2Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the 3Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 4Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union 5Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 6Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 7Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 8Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 9Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 10Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 11the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe 12and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 13Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 14the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 15Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 16Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 17Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 18Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section 196-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115, 2018d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 21Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real Property 22Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, the 23Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental Health 24Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection Act, or 25the Student Online Personal Protection Act, or Section 20 of 26the Fair Patient Billing Act commits an unlawful practice   HB3856- 4 -LRB104 12286 BAB 22400 b1within the meaning of this Act.2(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 3100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.)